Utah statutes.
26-34-2.   Definition of death -- Determination of death.

(1)  An individual is dead if the individual has sustained either:

(a)  irreversible cessation of circulatory and respiratory functions; or

(b)  irreversible cessation of all functions of the entire brain, including the brain stem.

(2)  A determination of death shall be made in accordance with accepted medical standards.



Amended by Chapter 297, 2011 General Session

